Utah statutes.
63L-1-206.   Concurrent jurisdiction.
The state of Utah hereby accepts from the United States concurrent
jurisdiction, both civil and criminal, with the United States over the
following described boundaries in the county of Weber, state of Utah, in the
Salt Lake Meridian:
(1)  As described more particularly in Subsection (2), a part of Section 7 in
Township 6 North, Range 1 West and a part of Section 12 in Township 6 North,
Range 2 West.
(2)  Beginning at a point South 0 degrees 46 minutes 27 seconds West 1540.37
feet and North 89 degrees 03 minutes 15 seconds West 258.80 feet and North 3
degrees 57 minutes 30 seconds West 10,877.85 feet and North 86 degrees 11
minutes 50 seconds East 80.74 feet and North 3 degrees 52 minutes 20 seconds
West 655.22 feet from the Northeast corner of the Northwest Quarter of Section
19 in said Township 6 North, Range 1 West; said point also being North 89
degrees 03 minutes 15 seconds West 253.25 feet and North 3 degrees 57 minutes
30 seconds West 10,945.10 feet and North 86 degrees 11 minutes 50 seconds East
80.74 feet and North 3 degrees 52 minutes 20 seconds West 655.22 feet from the
Ogden City survey monument at the intersection of the monument line of 12th
Street and the East line of the Northwest Quarter of said Section 19; said
point also being North 86 degrees 11 minutes 50 seconds East and North 3
degrees 52 minutes 20 seconds West 655.22 from the Southwest corner of the
Ogden City property (parcel 11-023-0029):
(a)  thence South 86 degrees 03 minutes 22 seconds West 2398.03 feet more or
less along an existing fenceline separating properties used by Defense Depot
Ogden and the U. S. Army Reserve to a point on the East line of 1200 West
Street;
(b)  thence North 1 degree 16 minutes 15 seconds East 66.27 feet along said
East line of 1200 West Street;
(c)  thence North 86 degrees 03 minutes 22 seconds East 2392.09 feet more or
less to a point on the West line of the Weber-Ogden Fairgrounds Complex; and
(d)  thence South 3 degrees 52 minutes 20 seconds East 66.00 feet along said
West line of the Weber-Ogden Fairgrounds Complex to the point of beginning.
